Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.120

Fidelity bonds.

The trustees of every savings bank shall have power to require from the officers, clerks, and agents thereof such security for their fidelity and the faithful performance of their duties as the trustees deem necessary. Such security may be accepted from any company authorized to furnish fidelity bonds and doing business under the laws of this state, and the premiums therefor may be paid as a necessary expense of the savings bank.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.16.120. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 37; RRS s 3366.]